Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Property and Funds of the University of Alaska.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 35-43.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 6-11.

Sec. 14.40.250.
Regents to act as trustees and administer money or property.

The Board of Regents may receive, manage, and invest money or other real, personal, or mixed property for the purpose of the University of Alaska, its improvement or adornment, or the aid or advantage of students or faculty, and, in general, may act as trustee on behalf of the University of Alaska for any of these purposes. The regents shall prepare a written report, in accordance with AS

14.40.190(a)

, as to the administration and disposition of money received under this section.

History.

(§ 37.10.20 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 2008)

Sec. 14.40.251.
Default on tuition, fees, and charges.

For the purposes of this chapter, tuition, a fee, or another charge to an individual by the University of Alaska is in default after payment has become 180 or more days past due. Upon default, the university may take the individual’s permanent fund dividend under AS

43.23.190

.

The University of Alaska shall notify the individual of the default and the consequences of default imposed under (a) of this section by mailing a notice to the individual’s most recent address provided to the university by the individual or obtained by the university.

An individual may appeal a notice of default by filing a statement with the chief finance officer of the University of Alaska within 30 days after the date of the notice, requesting that the default status be reviewed. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) does not apply to the review of default under this section. Within 40 days after receiving a written request for review, the chief finance officer shall inform the individual in writing of the decision. The decision of the chief finance officer is a final decision that may be appealed to the superior court under the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.190

” was substituted for “43.23.073” in subsection (a) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Sec. 14.40.253.
Financing notice and approval.

If the University of Alaska intends to enter into an obligation, except for refinancing obligations, under AS

14.40.040(a)(5)

with an annual payment by the university anticipated to exceed $2,500,000, the university shall provide notice to the legislature. The notice must include the anticipated annual payment amount, the anticipated financing, and the total construction, acquisition, or other costs of the project. The university may not enter into an obligation requiring a financing notice under this section, other than a refinancing obligation, unless the project has been approved by the legislature by law. An appropriation for the project does not constitute approval of the project for the purpose of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 181 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For the notice and legislative approval required under this section for the issuance of revenue bonds under AS

14.40.254

to pay for a new heat and power plant facility at the University of Alaska Fairbanks required under this section, see sec. 8, ch. 24, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the notice and legislative approval required under this section for the issuance of revenue bonds under AS

14.40.040(a)(5)

and entry into a loan agreement with the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority to pay for a new heat and power plant facility at the University of Alaska Fairbanks, see sec. 9, ch. 24, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 19, 2010, in the first sentence, substituted “$2,500,000” for “$1,000,000”.

Sec. 14.40.254.
University revenue bonds.

Subject to AS

14.40.253

, the board may issue revenue bonds to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or equipping a facility that the board determines is necessary.

The board may enter into an agreement with a trustee or bond owner for the purpose of securing payment of revenue bonds issued by the University of Alaska to acquire, construct, or equip a facility that the board determines is necessary. The agreement may include the fixing and collection of fees, charges, or rentals pledged to secure payment of the revenue bonds and agreement regarding the use of the proceeds of the revenue bonds.

The state pledges not to limit or alter rights vested under this section in the University of Alaska to fulfill the terms of a contract with revenue bond owners.

The board may pledge revenue received by the University of Alaska as fees, charges, or rentals in order to secure payment of the revenue bonds. A pledge of revenue received by the University of Alaska is considered a perfected security interest and is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The pledge creates an immediate lien against property pledged without physical delivery or other act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1991)

Sec. 14.40.255.
Investment of surplus money.

If the Board of Regents determines that there is a surplus of money, received in the form of state and federal appropriations, above the amount sufficient to meet current and projected cash expenditure needs of the university, the surplus must be invested as set out in AS

37.10.071

. Income earned on investments made under this section may be retained by the university and expended in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act.)

History.

(§ 4 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 141 SLA 1988)

Sec. 14.40.257.
Reimbursement for costs of capital projects.

Subject to appropriations for the purpose, during each fiscal year, the legislature may appropriate an amount to reimburse the University of Alaska for the cost to be paid by the university during that same fiscal year for the principal and interest on outstanding debt for the projects listed in (b) of this section.

An appropriation under this section may be used only for reimbursement of costs incurred for acquisition, construction, and renovation of the following projects and only for reimbursement of total project costs incurred up to the following amounts:

The University of Alaska is authorized to incur debt for the projects listed under (b) of this section. AS

14.40.253

does not apply to the projects listed in (b) of this section or to obligations incurred by the university to finance those projects.

PROJECT University of Alaska, Anchorage Community and Technical $14,000,000 College Center Juneau Readiness Center/UAS Joint Facility (Juneau) 5,470,000

Click to view

History.

(§ 4 ch 115 SLA 2002)

Sec. 14.40.260.
[Renumbered as AS 14.40.055.]

Sec. 14.40.270.
[Renumbered as AS 14.40.057.]

Sec. 14.40.280.
Endowments and donations.

Title to and control or possession of land, personal property, money, and other property that is devised, bequeathed, or given to the university shall be taken by the university in its corporate capacity acting by and through the Board of Regents or an authorized agent and shall be entered in the perpetual inventory of the university established in AS

14.40.330

.

All monetary gifts, bequests, or endowments that are made to the University of Alaska for the purpose of the separate endowment trust fund established under AS

14.40.400

shall be deposited into that endowment trust fund.

Except as provided by (b) of this section, the monetary gifts, bequests, or endowments that are made to the University of Alaska shall be managed and invested by the Board of Regents. In carrying out its management and investment responsibilities under this subsection, the Board of Regents has the same powers and duties with respect to the gifts, bequests, and endowments of the University of Alaska as are provided or required under AS

37.10.071

and AS 13.65 (Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, AS

37.10.071

governs the management and investment responsibilities established under this subsection if

both AS 37.10.071 and AS 13.65 apply to the management and investment responsibilities established under this subsection; and

AS 37.10.071 conflicts with AS 13.65.

History.

(§ 5 ch 58 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 9 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In (c) of this section, “AS 13.65” was substituted for “AS 13.70” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of that chapter.

Sec. 14.40.282.
Endowment for the physical sciences.

The Board of Regents shall establish an endowment for the physical sciences at the University of Alaska campus in Fairbanks. The endowment shall be managed as a perpetual trust. The income of the endowment shall be used to pay the salary and related expenses of the person appointed under (b) of this section for research, teaching, and advanced studies in one or more physical science disciplines.

The Board of Regents shall appoint a person who is distinguished in one or more physical science disciplines to be paid from the endowment for the physical sciences. The tenure and the duties of the appointee shall be established by the Board of Regents based on the need for

teaching, research, and studies in physical sciences of special interest in the state; and

advancement of scientific study at the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1983)

Sec. 14.40.290.
Property and funds generally.

Federal grants and appropriations paid to the commissioner of revenue under AS

14.40.380

,

14.40.410

, or

14.40.430

, or from a source described in AS

14.40.450

, shall be transferred to the state treasury under AS

37.10.060

. The Department of Administration, upon requisitions by the Board of Regents signed by its president and secretary, shall pay to the treasurer of the Board of Regents all federal land grant college funds coming into the possession of the Department of Administration and subject to requisition by the Board of Regents and shall disburse federal funds in aid of land grant colleges in accordance with the federal statute providing for disbursement.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 46 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 1 ch 38 SLA 1968.]

History.

(§ 37-10-4(a) — (c) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1968; am § 10 ch 46 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For provisions authorizing the Department of Administration to make advances to the University of Alaska, see AS

37.10.088

.

Sec. 14.40.291.
Land of the University of Alaska not public domain land.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, university-grant land, state replacement land that becomes university-grant land on conveyance to the university, land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365

, and any other land owned by the university is not and may not be treated as state public domain land. Land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365

shall be managed as nontaxable trust land under AS 14.40.365 —

14.40.367

and policies of the Board of Regents.

Title to or interest in land described in (a) of this section may not be acquired by adverse possession, prescription, or in any other manner except by conveyance from the university.

The land described in (a) of this section is subject to condemnation for public purpose in accordance with law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 22 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 8 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.295.
Working capital reserve fund. [Repealed, § 10 ch 46 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 14.40.296.
Working capital reserve fund.

There is established in the treasury of the University of Alaska the University of Alaska working capital reserve fund. The fund consists of money appropriated by the legislature for the purpose of providing nonlapsing current working capital for the University of Alaska and is not available for appropriation by the Board of Regents.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 117 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Sec. 14.40.300.
Creation and appointment of comptroller.

The Board of Regents shall create the office of comptroller of the university, fix the salary, and determine the duties of the office.
The Board of Regents shall fill the office.
The comptroller shall report directly to the Board of Regents.

History.

(§ 37-10-4(d) ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 46 SLA 1977)

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent on ch. 46, SLA 1977 (HCSSB 261), see 1977 House Journal, p. 1019.

Sec. 14.40.310.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of the University of Alaska begins on July 1 and closes at midnight on the following June 30.

History.

(§ 37-10-4(e) ACLA 1949; am § 3 art VI ch 82 SLA 1955)

Sec. 14.40.320.
Requisitions on funds. [Repealed, § 10 ch 46 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 14.40.325.
Reallocation within state appropriations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

37.07.080(e)

, each appropriation to the University of Alaska is subject to reallocation by the university administration under procedures established by the Board of Regents and the office of management and budget in the Office of the Governor. Transfers may not be made between appropriations except as provided in an act making transfers between appropriations.

History.

(§ 5 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 26 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 14.40.330.
Inventory of property.

The Board of Regents shall maintain or cause to be maintained a perpetual inventory of all permanent property of the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 37-10-4(g) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1968)

Sec. 14.40.340.
Applicability of bid practices to University of Alaska. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986. For current law, see AS 36.30.005(c).]

Sec. 14.40.350.
Board of Regents authorized to lease land.

The Board of Regents may execute leases for mining, agriculture, or other purposes to the land granted for the benefit of an agricultural college and school of mines for Alaska by the Act of Congress approved March 4, 1915, for such time and at such rent or royalty as may seem just and as provided by law.

History.

(§ 37-10-11 ACLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The restrictive clause in the federal grant (see former 48 USC § 354, now 43 USC § 852) dated March 4, 1915, of lands for the site of the present university states that this land must be used as a site for an agricultural college and school of mines. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

There appears to be no conflict with this required use by leasing, as is authorized by law, a portion of this land to a corporation for a definite period of time to provide a service which contributes to the required use. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Hence, there does not appear to be any violation in fact or in spirit of the restrictive clause in the federal grant by the lease of site lands to the University of Alaska Heating Corporation for the purpose of erecting a steam plant to serve the University of Alaska. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Sec. 14.40.360.
Board of Regents authorized to select and to sell or lease land granted by Act of Congress.

The Board of Regents may select the land granted to Alaska by the Act of Congress approved January 21, 1929, as amended, may sell or lease the land, and shall deposit the net income as provided in AS

14.40.400(a)

in conformity with that Act.

History.

(§ 37-10-13 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 9 SLA 1997)

Opinions of attorney general. —

See notes under this heading following AS

14.40.350

.

Sec. 14.40.365.
University land grant.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, before July 1, 2008, the commissioner of natural resources shall convey to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska, by quitclaim deed, the state land identified for conveyance to the university and described in the document titled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005.

As soon as practicable after June 30, 2055, the commissioner of natural resources shall convey to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska, by quitclaim deed, the state land described as the “University Research Forest” and identified for conveyance to the university in the document titled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005.

As soon as practicable after the receipt of patent from the United States, but not before the land is otherwise required to be conveyed under this section, the commissioner of natural resources shall convey to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska, by quitclaim deed, federal land that has been selected for conveyance to the state under the Alaska Statehood Act but is subject to a federal mining claim, and that is identified in the document titled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, for conveyance to the university upon the state’s acquisition of patent.

Notwithstanding AS

38.05.125(a)

, and except as otherwise provided in this section, the transfer of ownership of land from the commissioner of natural resources to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section includes the interest of the state in the coal, ores, minerals, fissionable materials, geothermal resources, and fossils, oil, and gas that may be in or on the land.

Land conveyed under this section to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska is subject to any valid possessory interest or other valid existing right, including any lease, license, contract, prospecting site, claim, sale, permit, right-of-way, Native allotment, or easement held by another person, including a federal, state, or municipal agency, on October 23, 2005.

Before conveying land under this section, the commissioner of natural resources shall reserve access under AS

38.05.127

, but other provisions of AS 38.04 and AS 38.05 do not apply to the commissioner’s preparation for conveyance of land to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section. In addition to access under AS

38.05.127

, the commissioner may reserve in the conveyance document existing offshore uses such as aquatic fish farm sites, anchorages for vessels, fish buying stations, trails, roads, and other access routes that provide public access to adjacent land and public waterways; however, an easement along tidewater reserved by the commissioner under AS 38.05.127 may not exceed 25 feet.

In addition to rights or an interest held by a person under (e) of this section, land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section

is subject to

sec. 6(i) of the Alaska Statehood Act (P.L. 85-508, 72 Stat. 339);

AS

19.10.010

;

any easement, right-of-way, or other access under former 43 U.S.C. 932 (sec. 8, Act of July 26, 1866, 14 Stat. 253);

the provisions of any memorandum of agreement entered into between the University of Alaska and the commissioner of natural resources governing shared benefits or costs associated with land to be conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska;

any interest transferred to the state by quitclaim deed dated June 30, 1959, under authority of the Alaska Omnibus Act (P.L. 86-70, 73 Stat. 141); and

excludes the mineral estate on land that is subject to a valid state mining claim.

As soon as practicable after the extinguishment, release, or expiration of a valid state mining claim located on land to be conveyed under this section, but not before the land is otherwise required to be conveyed under this section, the commissioner of natural resources shall convey the mineral estate excluded from conveyance under (g)(2) of this section.

The responsibility for the management of land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section vests with the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska on the date of recording of that conveyance.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska is entitled to receive any income derived from land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section accruing after the date of conveyance, including any income accruing from an existing lease, license, contract, prospecting site sale, permit, right-of-way, easement, or trespass claim.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, within 10 years after conveyance of land under this section, the Board of Regents may reconvey to the Department of Natural Resources land

containing hazardous waste that was present on the land before conveyance under this section;

on which is located a historic or archeological site that is subject to management under AS 41.35; or

that the Board of Regents and the commissioner of natural resources jointly agree is in the best interests of the state and the university to reconvey.

After October 23, 2005 and before the conveyance of a parcel of land to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section, the commissioner of natural resources may not convey, without consent of the university, any irrevocable interest in a parcel that is required to be conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under this section.

The commissioner of natural resources may make minor adjustments to the maps or legal descriptions of the state land identified for conveyance to the university and described in the document titled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, to correct omissions or errors.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the following state land described in the document entitled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, may not be conveyed to the University of Alaska under this section:

Parcel Number CS.DI.1001, Duke Island;

Parcel Number MF.1002, Idaho Inlet;

Parcel Number CS.KI.1001, Kelp Island;

Parcel Number HA.CH.1001, Haines-Chilkoot;

Parcel Number KT.1004, Neets Creek;

Parcel Number MA.KR.1001, Kodiak Rocket Range;

Parcel Number ST.1002, Pelican;

Parcel Number PA.1001, Port Alexander; and

Parcel Number ST.1002, Warm Springs Bay.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the state land identified in this subsection and described in the document entitled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, may not be conveyed to the University of Alaska under this section if the land is included in a borough formed before July 1, 2009, that includes Wrangell or Petersburg. If a borough is not formed before July 1, 2009, land described in this subsection shall be conveyed to the University of Alaska on July 1, 2009. If a borough is formed before July 1, 2009, and the borough does not select land described in this subsection before January 1, 2013, the land not selected by the borough shall be conveyed to the University of Alaska on June 30, 2013. The following land is subject to this subsection:

Parcel Number SD.1001, Beecher Pass;

Parcel Number SD.1001, Favor Peak;

Parcel Number CS.TL.1001, Three Lake Road;

Parcel Number SD.1001, Read Island;

Parcel Number SD.1001, Whitney Island;

Parcel Number CS.EW.1001, Earl West Cove;

Parcel Number CS.OV.1001, Olive Cove; and

Parcel Number SD.1001, Thoms Place.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, each of the following parcels described in the document entitled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, may not be conveyed to the University of Alaska under this section until all Native allotment applications applicable to that parcel have been denied:

Parcel Number PA.1002, Biorka Island; and

Parcel Number NS.NS.1001, Lisianski Peninsula.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the state land identified in this subsection and described in the document entitled “University of Alaska Land Grant List 2005,” dated January 12, 2005, may not be conveyed to the University of Alaska under this section if the land is included in a borough formed before July 1, 2009. If a borough is not formed before July 1, 2009, the land described in this subsection shall be conveyed to the University of Alaska on July 1, 2009. If a borough is formed before July 1, 2009, and the borough does not select land described in this subsection before January 1, 2013, the land not selected by the borough shall be conveyed to the University of Alaska on June 30, 2013. The following land is subject to the provisions of this subsection: Parcel Number PA.1002, Mite Cove.

History.

(§ 5 ch 136 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 8 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.366.
Management requirements for university land.

Before the conveyance or the disposal of an interest in the land to a third party, land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365

shall be managed in a manner that, to the extent practicable, permits reasonable activities of the public, including historic recent public uses, that do not interfere with the use or management of the land by the university.

For land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365

, the Board of Regents shall

seek public comment on proposals for land development, exchange, or sale; and

adopt policies that require the preparation of land development plans and land disposal plans.

Before the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska offers a parcel of land for sale under this section, the board shall offer first refusal to the closest municipality.

The Board of Regents shall adopt policies requiring public notice before approval of land development plans and land disposal plans. The policies must require that the notice be provided not less than 30 days before the proposed action and that the notice be

sent to local legislators, municipalities, and legislative information offices in the vicinity of the action and at other locations as the university may designate;

published in newspapers of general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed action at least once each week for two consecutive weeks; and

published on state and university public notice Internet websites.

In this section, “development, exchange, or sale” does not include the grant of an easement or right-of-way or the development of a campus facility.

History.

(§ 5 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 8 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.40.367.
Confidential records relating to university land and interests in land.

Notwithstanding AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

, on a determination that it is in the best interest of the University of Alaska or on the request of the person who has provided the information, the president of the university may keep the following confidential:

the name of a person applying for the sale, lease, or other disposal of university land or an interest in university land;

before the issuance of a notice of intent to award a contract relating to a sale, lease or disposal of university land or an interest in university land, the names of the participants and the terms of their offers;

all geological, well, geophysical, engineering, architectural, sales, market, cost, appraisal, timber cruise, gross receipts, net receipts, or other financial information relating to university land or an interest in university land and considered for, offered for, or currently subject to disposal or a contract;

cost data and financial information submitted by an applicant in support of applications for bonds, leases, or other information in offerings and ongoing operations relating to management of university land;

applications for rights-of-way or easements across university land; and

requests for information about or applications by public agencies for university land that is being considered for use for a public purpose.

History.

(§ 5 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, in the introductory language substituted “Notwithstanding AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “Notwithstanding AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

”.

Sec. 14.40.368.
Encumbrances and trespasses. [Repealed, § 8 ch 8 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 14.40.370.
Books of account and statement of trust funds. [Repealed, § 10 ch 46 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 14.40.380.
Assent of legislature to federal land and money grants.

The state assents to the provisions and accepts the benefits of the Act of Congress approved March 4, 1915, and the Acts of Congress approved August 30, 1890, and March 4, 1907, in behalf of the University of Alaska, and the commissioner of revenue is designated as the officer to whom the money shall be paid.

History.

(§ 37-10-10 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.390.
Federal land grants to Agricultural College and School of Mines reaccepted for university.

The state assents to the provisions and accepts the benefits of the grants of land authorized by the Act of Congress of January 21, 1929, 45 Stat. 1091 — 1093, as amended by the Act of Congress of September 19, 1966, 80 Stat. 811, for the Agricultural College and School of Mines as integral parts of the University of Alaska, and the University of Alaska is designated the beneficiary under that Act.

History.

(§ 37-10-12 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.40.400.
Fund for money from sale or lease of land granted by Act of Congress.

The Board of Regents shall establish a separate endowment trust fund in which shall be held in trust in perpetuity all

net income derived from the sale or lease of the land granted under the Act of Congress approved January 21, 1929, as amended;

net income derived from the sale, lease, or management of the land conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.365

; however, the amount deposited in the endowment trust fund under this paragraph resulting from mineral lease royalties and royalty sales proceeds may not be less than 25 percent of all such mineral lease royalties and royalty sales proceeds received by the university; and

monetary gifts, bequests, or endowments made to the University of Alaska for the purpose of the fund.

The Board of Regents is the fiduciary of the fund. The Board of Regents shall account for and invest the fund. In carrying out its investment responsibilities under this subsection, the Board of Regents has the same powers and duties with respect to the fund as are provided or required under AS

37.10.071

and AS 13.65 (Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, AS

37.10.071

governs the investment responsibilities established under this subsection if

both AS 37.10.071 and AS 13.65 apply to the investment responsibilities established under this subsection; and

AS 37.10.071 conflicts with AS 13.65.

The total return from the fund shall be used exclusively for the University of Alaska, as the successor under AS

14.40.030

of the Agricultural College and School of Mines.

The proceeds arising from the sale or disposal of land granted under the Act of Congress approved January 21, 1929, as amended, may not be used for the support of a sectarian or denominational college or school.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 9 SLA 1997.]

In this section,

“fund” means the separate endowment trust fund established under (a) of this section;

“total return” means the total earning of the fund, including current yield, gains, and capital appreciation, less all costs, expenses, losses, and capital depreciation.

History.

(§ 37-10-14 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 164 SLA 1976; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 141 SLA 1988; am §§ 6 — 10, 14 ch 9 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 8 FSSLA 2005; am § 37 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In (b) of this section, “AS 13.65” was substituted for “AS 13.70” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of that chapter.

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see AS

14.40.280

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 8, 2010, rewrote (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under this section a separate permanent fund was established for revenues from the sale of federally granted lands. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

The prudent-man rule is the proper rule for guiding the commissioner of revenue in the investment of the university’s permanent fund. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

In investing the endowment funds of the University of Alaska, the commissioner of revenue can obtain some guidance through observing the type of investments made throughout the United States by those responsible for the investment of university endowment funds. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

Sec. 14.40.410.
Federal grants of money to establish agricultural experiment stations.

The state assents to the provisions and accepts the benefits of the Act of Congress entitled “An Act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several States under the provisions of an Act approved July 2, 1862, and of the Acts supplementary thereto”approved March 2, 1887, as amended and supplemented and known as the Hatch Act, and extended to Alaska by an Act of Congress entitled “An Act to extend the benefits of the Hatch Act and the Smith-Lever Act to the Territory of Alaska,” approved February 23, 1929, in behalf of the University of Alaska, except that no substations may be established by the Board of Regents except by direct authority of the legislature.
The commissioner of revenue is designated as the officer to whom the money shall be paid.

History.

(§ 37-10-15 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For Hatch Act, see 7 U.S.C. 361a-361i; for Smith-Lever Act, see 7 U.S.C. 341-349.

Sec. 14.40.420.
University designated as beneficiary under Hatch Act and empowered to establish Agricultural Experiment Station.

The University of Alaska is designated as the beneficiary under the provisions of the Hatch Act and may establish a department to be known as the Agricultural Experiment Station.

History.

(§ 37-10-16 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

See the cross reference under AS

14.40.410

.

Sec. 14.40.430.
Acceptance of federal appropriation for agricultural extension work.

The state assents to the provisions and accepts the benefits of the Act of Congress entitled “An Act to provide for cooperative extension work between agricultural colleges in the United States receiving the benefits of an Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and of Acts supplementary thereto and the United States Department of Agriculture” approved May 8, 1914, as amended and supplemented and known as the Smith-Lever Act and extended to Alaska by an Act of Congress entitled “An Act to extend the benefits of the Hatch Act and the Smith-Lever Act to the Territory of Alaska” approved February 23, 1929, in behalf of the University of Alaska.
The commissioner of revenue is designated as the officer to whom the appropriations shall be paid.

History.

(§ 37-10-17 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

See the cross reference under AS

14.40.410

.

Sec. 14.40.440.
University designated beneficiary of Smith-Lever Act and empowered to carry on agricultural extension work.

The University of Alaska is designated as the beneficiary under the provisions of the Smith-Lever Act, and may administer and carry on agricultural extension work in the state in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture.

History.

(§ 37-10-18 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

See the cross reference under AS

14.40.410

.

Sec. 14.40.450.
Governor authorized to make certificates to obtain federal grants of money.

The governor is authorized to make all certificates required by law or the regulations of the Department of Agriculture or of the Department of the Interior necessary to be made to entitle the state to grants of money for the benefits of state colleges of agriculture and mechanic arts authorized under any Act of Congress.

History.

(§ 37-10-21 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.453.
Confidentiality of research.

The public records inspection requirements of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.121

do not apply to writings or records that consist of intellectual property or proprietary information received, generated, learned, or discovered during research conducted by the University of Alaska or its agents or employees until publicly released, copyrighted, or patented, or until the research is terminated, except that the university shall make available the title and a description of all research projects, the name of the researcher, and the amount and source of funding provided for each project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.121

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.121” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.121.

Sec. 14.40.455.
University risk management fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 14.40.458.
University corporate interests.

The university may purchase an interest in a corporation if the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska authorizes the purchase and the purchase advances a public purpose of the university.

If the university purchases an interest in a corporation, the corporation is not considered to be a part of the university for any purpose, except to the extent that both the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska and the corporation’s articles of incorporation state otherwise.

Notwithstanding AS

09.50.250

and any other law, the University of Alaska is not liable for the obligations of a corporation that the University of Alaska has purchased an interest in under (a) of this section,

except to the extent that the president of the university signs a written agreement on behalf of the university that expressly states that the university is liable for the obligations of the corporation and the obligations for which the university is liable are identified in the written agreement; or

unless the university has engaged in fraudulent or other wrongful conduct relating to an obligation of the corporation or to the assets of the corporation that may be used to pay the obligation.

In this section,

“corporation” means a for-profit corporation, a nonprofit corporation, or a limited liability company, whether or not the corporation or company is organized in this state;

“interest” means a membership, or a share or other ownership interest;

“nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c) (Internal Revenue Code);

“university” means the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.40.460.
[Renumbered as AS 14.43.010.]